Missouri, session 2026, HB2752.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.550, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 478.550, to read as follows:
478.550. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the twenty-third judicial circuit
consisting of the county of Jefferson. These judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two,
three and four. Beginning on January 1, 2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the twenty-
third judicial district and these judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three, four,
five, and six. The division eleven associate circuit judge position and the division twelve
associate circuit judge shall become circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007. The
division eleven associate circuit judge shall be numbered as division five and the division
twelve associate circuit judge shall be numbered as division six.
2. The circuit judge in division three shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judges in
divisions one and four shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division two shall be
elected in 1984. The circuit judges in divisions five and six shall be elected for a six-year
term in 2006.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court commissioner position in the twenty-
third judicial district appointed under section 487.020 shall become an associate circuit judge
position in all respects and shall be designated as division eleven. This position may retain
the duties and responsibilities with regard to the family court. The associate circuit judge in
division eleven shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year term. This associate circuit
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2752 2
judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate
circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
4. Beginning January 1, 2007, the treatment court commissioner position in the
twenty-third judicial district appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate
circuit judge position in all respects and shall be designated as division twelve. This position
may retain the duties and responsibilities with regard to the treatment court. The associate
circuit judge in division twelve shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year term. This
associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
5. There shall be one additional associate circuit judge position in the twenty-
third judicial circuit. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the
statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit judgeships per county
under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge shall
serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028.
✔